Connecticut, session 2026, SB00050.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction for any stipend paid to a volunteer
firefighter or volunteer ambulance member by a municipality, a
volunteer fire department or a volunteer ambulance association,
provided such firefighter or ambulance member receives not more than
fifteen thousand dollars from the municipality, volunteer fire
department or volunteer ambulance association, for other duties
performed.